Utah statutes.
19-6-1005.   Reporting requirements.

(1)  Each manufacturer that is required to implement a plan shall submit, either individually or in cooperation with other manufacturers, an annual report on the plan's implementation to the director within 90 days after the anniversary of the date on which the manufacturer is required to begin plan implementation.

(2)  The report shall include:

(a)  the number of mercury switches collected;

(b)  the number of mercury switches for which the manufacturer has provided reimbursement;

(c)  a description of the successes and failures of the plan; and

(d)  a statement that details the costs required to implement the plan.



Amended by Chapter 360, 2012 General Session

